Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-804
Civil action; appropriate relief.

Any person aggrieved by a violation of the Personal Privacy Protection Act may bring a civil action for appropriate relief. Appropriate relief includes:

(1) The greater of actual damages or two thousand five hundred dollars in liquidated damages per violation; and

(2) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be appropriate.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 20.